District of Columbia statutes.
3-1210.08

Prosecutions.

(a)

Prosecutions for violations of this chapter shall be brought in the name of the District of Columbia by the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia.

(b)

In any prosecution brought under this chapter, any person claiming an exemption from licensure, registration, or certification under this chapter shall have the burden of providing entitlement to the exemption.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1008, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(aa), 42 DCR 457
July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(i), 56 DCR 4043
1981 Ed., § 2-3310.8.
D.C. Law 18-26, in subsec. (a), substituted “Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”; and, in subsec. (b), substituted “from licensure, registration, or certification” for “from licensing”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(i) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).